District of Columbia statutes.
40-405

Personal property vested in occupant.

Unless the rental agreement specifically provides otherwise and until a lien sale under this chapter, the exclusive care, custody, and control of all personal property stored in the leased self-service storage space shall remain vested in the occupant.

Feb. 6, 2004, D.C. Law 15-64, § 6, 50 DCR 9303

History